Utah statutes.
20A-16-301.   Overseas voter's registration address.

In registering to vote, an overseas voter who is eligible to vote in the state shall:

(1)  use and be assigned to the voting precinct of the address of the last place of residence of the voter in the state; or

(2)  if the address described in Subsection (1) is no longer a recognized residential address, be assigned an address for voting purposes.



Enacted by Chapter 327, 2011 General Session

